Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.240

Court order not deemed conviction of crime.

An order of court adjudging a child a juvenile offender or dependent under the provisions of this chapter shall in no case be deemed a conviction of crime.

[ 2010 c 150 s 1; 1961 c 302 s 16. Prior: 1913 c 160 s 10, part; RCW 13.04.090, part.]